Wyoming, session 2026, HB0191.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-3-110(a)(ii)(intro) is amended to
read:

21-3-110. Duties of boards of trustees.

(a) The board of trustees in each school district
shall:
HB0191

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0430

(ii) Keep minutes of all meetings at which
official action is taken and a record of all official acts
including a record of all warrants issued against the
monies belonging to the school district. Effective July 1,
2026, each meeting at which official action is taken shall
be broadcast live over the internet unless an internet
connection is unavailable or the meeting cannot be
broadcast due to other unforeseen circumstances. The
minutes, a recording of any broadcast of the meeting and
records shall be public records. A list of each warrant
over five hundred dollars ($500.00) shall be published one
(1) time in a legal newspaper of general circulation within
the respective county within thirty (30) days of the date
of the meeting. Individual yearly gross salary payments
need be published only once in March of each year:

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0191